Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-2,102
Fee or assessment; lien.

A fee or assessment levied pursuant to section 46-299 shall become a lien on the property benefited, or to be benefited, thirty days after the due date of such fee or assessment. The person levying the fee or assessment may collect such fee or assessment if it remains unpaid after thirty days after the due date by commencing an action in district court against the owner of the land benefited or to be benefited to foreclose the lien or to recover the amount due, except that no lien shall become effective until notice thereof is filed with the register of deeds in the county in which the benefited property is located and such lien shall relate back only to the date of filing.

Laws 1983, LB 198, § 16;

Laws 1989, LB 45, § 5.